District of Columbia statutes.
8-104.07

Rules; enforcement.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

Apr. 20, 2013, D.C. Law 19-262, § 207, 60 DCR 1300